Utah statutes.
31A-35-605.   Guarantors -- Agreement and enforcement.
(1)  All agreements of persons to act as guarantor for a bail bond shall be in
writing or reduced to writing as soon as possible after completion.
(2)  When a person executes an agreement to act as a guarantor, the bail bond
surety company or the bail bond producer shall deliver to that person a copy
of the agreement promptly upon that person's execution of the agreement.
(3)  A bail bond producer may not enforce any guarantor agreement without
disclosing to the guarantor all collateral held by the bail bond producer
indemnifying the bond to which the agreement relates, and the identity of each
other guarantor.
